Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Chapter 5 Child Custody

Cross references. —

As to disposition for custody and visitation in decree, see §

20-2-201

et seq.

As to disposition for child support, see §

20-2-301

et seq.

Cited

in

Basolo v. Gose, 994 P.2d 968,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Mediation and Wyoming Domestic Relations Cases — Practical Considerations, Ethical Concerns and Proposed Standards of Practice,” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 435 (1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility of social worker's expert testimony on child custody issues, 1 ALR4th 837.

Propriety of awarding joint custody of children, 17 ALR4th 1013.

Interference by custodian of child with noncustodial parent's visitation rights as ground for change of custody, 28 ALR4th 9.

Attorneys' fee awards in parent-nonparent child custody cases, 45 ALR4th 212.

Parent's transsexuality as factor in award of custody of children, visitation rights or termination of parental rights, 59 ALR4th 1170.

Tort liability of public authority for failure to remove parentally abused or neglected children from parents' custody, 60 ALR4th 942.

State court's authority, in marital or child custody proceeding, to allocate federal income tax dependency exemption for child to noncustodial parent under § 152(e) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 USC § 152(e)), 77 ALR4th 786.

Applicability of Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act (UCCJA) to temporary custody orders, 81 ALR4th 1101.

Child custody: when does state that issued previous custody determination have continuing jurisdiction under Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act (UCCJA) or Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act (PKPA), 28 USC § 1738A, 83 ALR4th 742.

Child custody and visitation rights of person infected with AIDS, 86 ALR4th 211.

Age of parent as factor in awarding custody, 34 ALR5th 57.

Recognition and enforcement of out-of-state custody decree under § 13 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act (UCCJA) or the Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act (PKPA), 28 USC § 1738A(a), 40 ALR5th 227.

Initial award or denial of child custody to homosexual or lesbian parent, 62 ALR5th 591.

Custodial parent's homosexual or lesbian relationship with third person as justifying modification of child custody order, 65 ALR5th 591.

Admissibility of expert testimony regarding questions of domestic law, 66 ALR5th 135.

Custodial parent's relocation as grounds for change of custody, 70 ALR5th 377.

Abandonment jurisdiction of court under §§ 3(a)(3)(i) and 14(a) of Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act and Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act, 28 U.S.C. §§ 1738A(c)(2)(C)(i) and 1738A(f), notwithstanding existence of prior valid custody decree rendered by second state, 78 ALR5th 465.

Validity, construction and application of Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act, 78 ALR4th 1028, 5 ALR5th 550, 5 ALR5th 788, 6 ALR5th 1, 6 ALR5th 69.

Construction and operation of Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, 100 ALR5th 1.

Construction and application of International Child Abduction Remedies Act (42 USC § 11601 et seq.), 125 ALR Fed 217.

Library References.

Family Law and Practice § 32.02 (Matthew Bender).